src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_HELPOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 back 0~p o
!!€  helpota: helpota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # ease
0:ot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pone  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pone  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pone  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:pon  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pon  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pon  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:on  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pone  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_LOITOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 back 0~t
!!€  loitota: loitota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # distance
0:ot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tone  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tone  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tone  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:ton  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ton  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ton  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:on  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tone  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_ULOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 back 0~k o
!!€  ulota: ulota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # outen
0:ot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kone  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kone  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kone  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:kon  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kon  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:kon  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:on  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kone  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KAVETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 back v~p
!!€  kaveta: kaveta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # tighten
0:vet  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:vet  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pene  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pene  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pene  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:pen  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pen  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pen  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:vet  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ven  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vet  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vet  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pene  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_MÄDÄTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 front d~t
!!€  mädätä: mädätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # rot
0:dät  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:dät  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:täne  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:täne  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:täne  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:tän  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tän  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tän  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:dät  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:dän  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:dä  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:dät  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:dät  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:täne  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_LEUDOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 back d~t
!!€  leudota: leudota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:dot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tone  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tone  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tone  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:ton  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ton  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ton  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:don  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:do  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tone  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_PIDETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 front d~t e
!!€  pidetä: pidetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # lengthen
0:det  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tene  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tene  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tene  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:ten  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ten  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ten  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:den  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_LÄMMETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 front m~p 
!!€  lämmetä: lämmetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # warm
0:met  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:met  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:pene  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pene  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pene  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:pen  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pen  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pen  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:met  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:men  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:me  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:met  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:met  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pene  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KIINNETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 front n~t
!!€  kiinnetä: kiinnetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # firm
0:net  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tene  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tene  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tene  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:ten  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ten  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ten  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:nen  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tene  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_JULJETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 back j~k
!!€  juljeta: juljeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # dare
0:jet  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:jet  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kene  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kene  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kene  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:ken  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ken  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ken  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:jet  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:jen  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:je  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:jet  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:jet  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kene  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!! ### Vowel lengthening(?) stems

LEXICON VERB_ARVATA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 73 back
!!€  arvata: arvata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # guess
0:t  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:n  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_YNNÄTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 73 front
!!€  ynnätä: ynnätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # add
0:t  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_MORKATA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 73 back 0~k
!!€  morkata: morkata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # blame
0:at  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kaa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kaa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ka  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:kas  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kas  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ka  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:an  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kaa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_YÖKÄTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 73 front 0~k
!!€  yökätä: yökätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # yuck
0:ät  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ät  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kää  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kää  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:käs  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:käs  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:kä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ät  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:än  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ät  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:ät  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kää  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SIEPATA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 73 back 0~p
!!€  siepata: siepata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # kidnap
0:at  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:paa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:paa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pas  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pas  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:an  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:paa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;
