src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
bluffata+V:bluffa  VERB_ARVATA  ;
breikata+V:breik  VERB_MORKATA  ;
dokata+V:doka  VERB_ARVATA  ;
donkata+V:donk  VERB_MORKATA  ;
dumpata+V:dump  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
edetä+V:e  VERB_PIDETÄ  ;
faksata+V:faksa  VERB_ARVATA  ;
friteerata+V:friteera  VERB_ARVATA  ;
guuglata+V:guugla  VERB_ARVATA  ;
halveta+V:hal  VERB_KAVETA  ;
harpata+V:harp  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
heikota+V:heik  VERB_ULOTA  ;
heivata+V:heiva  VERB_ARVATA  ;
helpota+V:help  VERB_HELPOTA  ;
hikata+V:hik  VERB_MORKATA  ;
huipata+V:huip  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
huoata+V:huo  VERB_MORKATA  ;
hustlata+V:hustla  VERB_ARVATA  ;
huutokaupata+V:huutokaup  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
huveta+V:hu  VERB_KAVETA  ;
hylätä+V:hyl  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
hyrrätä+V:hyrrä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
hyökätä+V:hyök  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
häslätä+V:häslä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
hölkätä+V:hölk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
höösätä+V:höösä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
iätä+V:i  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
jelpata+V:jelp  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
joiata+V:joi  VERB_MORKATA  ;
juljeta+V:jul  VERB_JULJETA  ;
jyrätä+V:jyrä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
järkätä+V:järk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
kaalata+V:kaala  VERB_ARVATA  ;
kaapata+V:kaap  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
kalveta+V:kal  VERB_KAVETA  ;
karata+V:kar  VERB_MORKATA  ;
karjeta+V:kar  VERB_JULJETA  ;
kaupata+V:kaup  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
kaveta+V:ka  VERB_KAVETA  ;
kehnätä+V:kehnä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
kestovärjätä+V:kestovärjä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
kiinnetä+V:kiin  VERB_KIINNETÄ  ;
kipata+V:kip  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
kloonata+V:kloona  VERB_ARVATA  ;
kokata+V:kok  VERB_MORKATA  ;
kopata+V:kop  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
koukata+V:kouk  VERB_MORKATA  ;
kuopata+V:kuop  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
kuorsata+V:kuorsa  VERB_ARVATA  ;
kuumamuokata+V:kuumamuok  VERB_MORKATA  ;
kyhätä+V:kyhä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
kämmätä+V:kämmä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
larpata+V:larp  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
laukata+V:lauk  VERB_MORKATA  ;
leudota+V:leu  VERB_LEUDOTA  ;
liata+V:li  VERB_MORKATA  ;
liftata+V:lifta  VERB_ARVATA  ;
liipata+V:liip  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
lisätä+V:lisä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
loikata+V:loik  VERB_MORKATA  ;
loitota+V:loit  VERB_LOITOTA  ;
lykätä+V:lyk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
läiskätä+V:läiskä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
lämmetä+V:läm  VERB_LÄMMETÄ  ;
löyhkätä+V:löyhkä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
maata+V:ma  VERB_MORKATA  ;
mestata+V:mesta  VERB_ARVATA  ;
morkata+V:mork  VERB_MORKATA  ;
mädätä+V:mä  VERB_MÄDÄTÄ  ;
mählätä+V:mählä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
mässätä+V:mässä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
mönjätä+V:mönjä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
möykätä+V:möyk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
napata+V:nap  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
naukata+V:nauk  VERB_MORKATA  ;
niklata+V:nikla  VERB_ARVATA  ;
nyökätä+V:nyök  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
näplätä+V:näplä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
näykätä+V:näyk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
paikata+V:paik  VERB_MORKATA  ;
pauhata+V:pauha  VERB_ARVATA  ;
peipata+V:peip  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
pelätä+V:pel  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
pidetä+V:pi  VERB_PIDETÄ  ;
polttolakata+V:polttolak  VERB_MORKATA  ;
polttoleimata+V:polttoleima  VERB_ARVATA  ;
prepata+V:prep  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
prässätä+V:prässä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
pyykätä+V:pyyk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
pökätä+V:pök  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
radioleimata+V:radioleima  VERB_ARVATA  ;
rampata+V:ramp  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
rohjeta+V:roh  VERB_JULJETA  ;
ruinata+V:ruina  VERB_ARVATA  ;
ruiskulakata+V:ruiskulak  VERB_MORKATA  ;
ruopata+V:ruop  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
ryysätä+V:ryysä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
rätkätä+V:rätkä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
rääkätä+V:rääk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
siklata+V:sikla  VERB_ARVATA  ;
skarpata+V:skarp  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
sminkata+V:smink  VERB_MORKATA  ;
speksata+V:speksa  VERB_ARVATA  ;
stumpata+V:stump  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
syynätä+V:syynä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
sönkätä+V:sönk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
tankata+V:tank  VERB_MORKATA  ;
tarhata+V:tarha  VERB_ARVATA  ;
tarjeta+V:tar  VERB_JULJETA  ;
topata+V:top  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
tuftata+V:tufta  VERB_ARVATA  ;
tulkata+V:tulk  VERB_MORKATA  ;
tumpata+V:tump  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
tyhjätä+V:tyhjä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
tykätä+V:tyk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
tyrkätä+V:tyrk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
tärkätä+V:tärk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
tökätä+V:tök  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
töllätä+V:töllä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
törkätä+V:törk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
töykätä+V:töyk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
ulota+V:ul  VERB_ULOTA  ;
urjeta+V:ur  VERB_JULJETA  ;
valjeta+V:val  VERB_JULJETA  ;
valssata+V:valssa  VERB_ARVATA  ;
vampata+V:vamp  VERB_SIEPATA  ;
virkata+V:virk  VERB_MORKATA  ;
yhdetä+V:yh  VERB_PIDETÄ  ;
ynnätä+V:ynnä  VERB_YNNÄTÄ  ;
yökätä+V:yök  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
zoomata+V:zooma  VERB_ARVATA  ;
änkätä+V:änk  VERB_YÖKÄTÄ  ;
